New York, session 2025-2026, S6488.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 24-0707 to read as follows: 3 § 24-0707. Mitigation of impacts. 4 When approving proposals to enhance the existing benefits provided by 5 a wetland or to create and maintain new wetland benefits in order to 6 increase the likelihood that a proposed activity will meet the applica- 7 ble standard for permit issuance, the mitigation may occur within the 8 same watershed as the proposed project. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10935-01-5